Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1499.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 41, chapter 4, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 41-710.04, to read: START_STATUTE41-710.04. Telecommunications service provider; rural areas; definition A. Notwithstanding any other law, the department shall negotiate and enter into a contract with a telecommunications service provider to provide telecommunications services in rural or underserved areas of this state. B. For the purposes of this section, "Telecommunications service provider": 1. Means an entity that offers voice, data or video transmission for a fee. 2. Includes: (a) Traditional telephone companies. (b) Broadband providers. (c) Cell phone carriers. END_STATUTE